cs: Tvar těla ukulele: Pádlo; S výřezem; Ve tvaru kytary; Ananas; Rezonátor; Tradiční osmička; Ostatní
zh-TW: 烏克麗麗琴身形狀: 船槳型; 缺角型; 吉他型; 鳳梨型; 共鳴器型; 傳統 8 字型; 其他
pl: Kształt korpusu ukulele: Kształt wiosła; Z wycięciem; Kształt gitary; Kształt ananasa; Rezonator; Tradycyjna ósemka; Inne
it: Forma del corpo dell'ukulele: A remo; A spalla mancante; A forma di chitarra; Ad ananas; Risonatore; Tradizionale a 8; Altro
fi: Ukulelen rungon muoto: Airon lapa; Soololovi; Kitaran muotoinen; Ananas; Resonaattori; Perinteinen kahdeksikko; Muu
vi: Hình dáng thân đàn Ukulele: Hình mái chèo; Cắt khuyết; Hình đàn guitar; Hình quả dứa; Cộng hưởng; Hình số 8 truyền thống; Khác
el: Σχήμα σώματος ουκουλέλε: Κουπί βάρκας; Cutaway; Σε σχήμα κιθάρας; Ανανάς; Resonator; Παραδοσιακό σχήμα 8; Άλλο
hu: Ukulele testformája: Evezőlapát; Kivágott; Gitár alakú; Ananász; Rezonátoros; Hagyományos 8-as alakú; Egyéb
zh-CN: 尤克里里琴身形状: 船桨型; 缺角型; 吉他型; 菠萝型; 共鸣器型; 传统 8 字型; 其他
ru: Форма корпуса укулеле: Форма весла; С вырезом; В форме гитары; Ананас; Резонаторная; Традиционная восьмёрка; Другое
lt-LT: Ukulelės korpuso formos: Irklo formos; Su išpjova; Gitaros formos; Ananaso formos; Rezonatorius; Tradicinė aštuoniukės formos; Kita
ko: 우쿨렐레 바디 모양: 보트 패들; 컷어웨이; 기타형; 파인애플; 리조네이터; 전통적인 8자형; 기타
ja: ウクレレボディ形状: ボートパドル型; カッタウェイ; ギター型; パイナップル型; リゾネーター; 伝統的な8の字型; その他
es: Forma del cuerpo del ukelele: Remo de bote; Cutaway; Con forma de guitarra; Piña; Resonador; Figura de 8 tradicional; Otro
nb: Ukulele-kroppsformer: Båtåre; Cutaway; Gitarformet; Ananas; Resonator; Tradisjonelt åttetall; Annet
nl: Ukulele bodyvorm: Boat paddle; Cutaway; Gitaarvorm; Ananas; Resonator; Traditionele 8-vorm; Anders
sk-SK: Tvar tela ukulele: Lodné pádlo; Výrez; V tvare gitary; Ananás; Rezonátor; Tradičná osmička; Iné
bg-BG: Форма на корпуса на укулелето: Гребло за лодка; Изрязано; Форма на китара; Ананас; Резонатор; Традиционна осмица; Друга
th: รูปทรงของอูคูเลเล่: ทรงไม้พาย; ทรงเว้า; ทรงกีตาร์; ทรงสับปะรด; เรโซเนเตอร์; ทรงเลข 8 แบบดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
tr: Ukulele gövde şekli: Kayık küreği; Kesim; Gitar şekilli; Ananas; Rezonatör; Geleneksel 8 figürü; Diğer
hr-HR: Oblik tijela ukulele: Oblik vesla; S izrezom; Oblik gitare; Ananas; Rezonator; Tradicionalna osmica; Ostalo
sl-SI: Oblika trupa ukuleleja: Oblika vesla; Z izrezom; Oblika kitare; Ananas; Resonator; Tradicionalna oblika osmice; Drugo
ro-RO: Forma corpului ukulelei: Vâslă; Cutaway; În formă de chitară; Ananas; Rezonator; Formă tradițională de 8; Altele
de: Korpusform der Ukulele: Boat Paddle; Cutaway; Gitarrenform; Pineapple; Resonator; Traditionelle Achterform; Andere
pt-BR: Ukulele corpo formato: Remo de barco; Cutaway; Formato de violão; Abacaxi; Ressonador; Oito tradicional; Outro
fr: Forme du corps de l’ukulélé: En forme de pagaie; Pan coupé; En forme de guitare; Forme ananas; Résonateur; En 8 traditionnel; Autre
en: Ukulele body shape: Boat paddle; Cutaway; Guitar-shaped; Pineapple; Resonator; Traditional figure-8; Other
sv: Ukulelekroppens form: Båtpaddel; Cutaway; Gitarrformad; Ananas; Resonator; Traditionell 8-form; Övrigt
pt-PT: Forma do corpo do ukulele: Remo; Cutaway; Formato de guitarra; Ananás; Ressonador; Figura em 8 tradicional; Outro
da: Kropsform for ukulele: Bådpaddel; Cutaway; Guitarformet; Ananas; Resonator; Traditionel 8-tal; Andet